Massachusetts, session 194th, H765.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1: Section 8B of chapter 40 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in lines 2 and 3, after the words “carrying out 
programs” the following words:- and delivering services.    
SECTION 2: Said section 8B of chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further amended 
by striking out, in line 3, the words “problems of the aging” and inserting in place thereof the 
following words:- needs of older adults.    
SECTION 3: Said section 8B of chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further amended 
by striking out, in line 9, the words “such clerks” and inserting in place thereof the following 
word:- staff.   

of 2 10  SECTION 4: Said section 8B of chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further amended 
by inserting, in lines 9 and 10, after the words “as it may require” the following words:- ; 
provided, that if the council is an advisory council, the director may appoint staff and other 
employees as it may require consistent with municipal needs.